Utah statutes.
59-2-902.   Minimum basic tax levy for school districts.
(1)  If any county fails to comply with Section 59-2-704, then this section
determines the adjustment of the basic school levy for school districts within
the county.  Before June 15, the commission shall ascertain from the State
Board of Education the number of weighted pupil units in each school district
in the state for the school year commencing July 1 of the current calendar
year, estimated according to the Minimum School  Program Act, and the money
necessary for the cost of the operation and maintenance of the minimum school
program of the state for the school fiscal year beginning July 1 of the
current calendar year.  The commission shall then estimate the amounts of all
surpluses in the Uniform School Fund, as of July 1 of the current calendar
year, available for the operation and maintenance of the program, and shall
estimate the anticipated income to the fund available for those purposes for
the current school year from all sources, including revenues from taxes on
income or from taxes on intangible property pursuant to Article XIII, Sec.
12, Utah Constitution.
(2)  The commission shall then determine for each school district the amount
to be raised by the minimum basic tax levy as its contribution toward the cost
of the basic state-supported program, as required by the Minimum School
Program Act.
(3)  Each county auditor shall be notified by the commission that the minimum
basic tax levy shall be imposed by the school district, to which shall be
added an additional amount, if any, due to local undervaluation as provided in
this section.  The auditor shall inform the county legislative body as to the
amount of the levy.  The county legislative body shall at the time and in the
manner provided by law make the levy upon the taxable property in the school
district together with further levies for school purposes as may be required
by each school district to pay the costs of programs in excess of the basic
state-supported school program.
(4)  If the levy applied under this section raises an amount in excess of the
total basic state-supported school program for a school district, the excess
amount shall be remitted by the school district to the State Board of
Education to be credited to the Uniform School Fund for allocation to school
districts to support the basic state-supported school program.  The
availability of money shall be considered by the commission in fixing the
state property levy as provided in the Minimum School Program Act.
(5)  If the levy does not raise an amount in excess of the total basic state-
supported school program for a district, then the difference between the
amount which the local levy will raise within the district, and the total cost
of the basic state-supported school program within the district shall be
computed.  This difference, if any, shall be apportioned from the Uniform
School Fund to each school district as the contribution of the state to the
basic state-supported school program for the district, subject to the
following conditions:
(a)  Before the apportionment is made, the commission shall determine if the
local taxable valuation of any school district is undervalued according to law
and if so, the dollar amount of the undervaluation.  The dollar amount of the
undervaluation shall be multiplied by the district basic uniform school levy
at 98%.  The resulting dollar amount shall be divided by the current year
estimated yield of .0002 per dollar of taxable value at 98% based on the
district's taxable valuation prior to adjusting for undervaluation.
(b)  The resulting levy amount shall be added to the required district basic
uniform levy to determine the combined district basic school levy adjusted for
undervaluation.  The combined rate of levy shall be certified to the county
auditor and employed by the auditor and the county legislative body in lieu of
the required basic school local levy.
